Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2801.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Practice of radiologic technology” means the practice of:

radiography;

nuclear medicine technology; or

radiation therapy.

“Practice of radiography” means the direct application of ionizing radiation to human beings.

“Practice of nuclear medicine technology” means the act of giving a radioactive substance to a human being or the act of performing associated imaging procedures, or both.

“Practice of radiation therapy” means the direct application of ionizing radiation to human beings for therapeutic purposes or the act of performing associated imaging procedures, or both.

“Licensed practitioner” means a person licensed under this title to practice medicine, osteopathy, advanced practice registered nursing, dentistry, podiatry, naturopathic medicine, or chiropractic.

“Financial interest” means being:

a licensed practitioner of radiologic technology;

a person who deals in goods and services that are uniquely related to the practice of radiologic technology; or

a person who has invested anything of value in a business that provides radiologic technology services.

“Unauthorized practice” means conduct prohibited by section 2802 of this chapter and not exempted by section 2803 of this chapter.

“Direct supervision” means that the person being supervised remains in the physical presence of the supervisor at all times.

“General supervision” means that the supervisor is readily available for consultation or intervention on the premises where radiologic technology services are being provided.

“ARRT” means the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists.

“NMTCB” means the Nuclear Medicine Technologist Certification Board.

“Office” means the Office of Professional Regulation.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 40;

1999, No. 52

, § 15;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 38;

2019, No. 30

, § 18.

§ 2802.
Prohibitions.

[Repealed.]

A person shall not practice radiologic technology unless he or she is licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

A person shall not practice radiography without a license for radiography unless exempt under section 2803 of this chapter.

[Repealed.]

A person shall not practice nuclear medicine technology without a license for that purpose unless exempt under section 2803 of this chapter.

A person shall not practice radiation therapy technology without a license for that purpose unless exempt under section 2803 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 41;

1999, No. 52

, § 16;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 39;

2019, No. 30

, § 18.

§ 2803.
Exemptions.

The prohibitions in section 2802 of this chapter shall not apply to dentists licensed under chapter 12 of this title and actions within their scope of practice nor to:

Licensed practitioners acting within the scope of practice for their licensed field, provided that their practice acts and rules adopted thereunder have been expressly found by the Director, in consultation with advisors appointed under this chapter, to match or surpass the training in radiation safety and proper radiation practices required by this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

Students of medicine, dentistry, podiatry, naturopathic medicine, or chiropractic when participating in a program approved or recognized by the Board of Medical Practice, Board of Dental Examiners, or Board of Chiropractic, as appropriate, and when under the general supervision of an instructor who is a licensed practitioner and when acting within the scope of practice for that licensed practitioner’s field.

Students in an approved school of radiologic technology under the general supervision of a licensed practitioner or licensed radiologic technologist.

Any person acting as an employee of the United States.

Any of the following when operating dental radiographic equipment to conduct intraoral radiographic examinations under the general supervision of a licensed practitioner; and any of the following when operating dental radiographic equipment to conduct specialized radiographic examinations, including tomographic, cephalometric, or temporomandibular joint examinations, if the person has completed a course in radiography approved by the Board of Dental Examiners and practices under the general supervision of a licensed practitioner:

a licensed dental therapist;

a licensed dental hygienist;

a registered dental assistant who has completed a course in radiography approved by the Board of Dental Examiners; or

a student of dental therapy, dental hygiene, or dental assisting as part of the training program when under the direct supervision of a licensed dentist, licensed dental therapist, licensed dental hygienist, or registered dental assistant.

Licensees certified in one of the three primary modalities set forth in section 2821a of this chapter preparing for postprimary certification in accordance with ARRT or NMTCB under the general supervision of a licensee already certified in the specific postprimary modality at issue.

Researchers operating bone densitometry equipment for body composition upon successful completion of courses on body composition and radiation safety approved by the Director. The Director shall not require this coursework to exceed eight hours. The Director may consider other exemptions from licensure for bona fide research projects subject to course and examination requirements as deemed necessary for public protection.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

1999, No. 52

, § 17;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 40;

2015, No. 38

, § 27, eff. May 28, 2015;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2019, No. 30

, § 18.

§ 2804.
Competency requirement of certain licensed practitioners.

Unless the requirements of subdivision 2803(1) of this chapter have been satisfied, a licensed practitioner shall not apply ionizing radiation to human beings without first having satisfied the Director of his or her competency to do so.

The Director shall:

consult with the appropriate licensing boards concerning suitable performance standards; and

by rule, provide for periodic recertification of competency.

A person subject to the provisions of this section shall be subject to the fees established under subdivisions 2814(4) and (5) of this chapter.

This section does not apply to radiologists who are certified or eligible for certification by the American Board of Radiology, nuclear cardiologists who are certified or eligible for certification by the Certification Board of Nuclear Cardiology, or interventional cardiologists and electrophysiologists who are certified or eligible for certification by the American Board of Internal Medicine.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 43;

1995, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1999, No. 52

, § 18;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 41;

2015, No. 38

, § 28, eff. May 28, 2015;

2017, No. 48

, § 19;

2019, No. 30

, § 18.

§ 2805.
Penalty and enforcement.

A person found guilty of violating section 2802 or 2804 of this chapter shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2007, No. 29

, § 38;

2019, No. 30

, § 18.